Illinois, session 104th, HB3771.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1575 and 1590 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/1575)7    Sec. 1575. Contract between public adjuster and insured.8    (a) Public adjusters shall ensure that all contracts for 9their services are in writing and contain the following terms:10        (1) legible full name of the adjuster signing the 11    contract, as specified in Department records;12        (2) permanent home state business address, email 13    address, and phone number;14        (3) license number;15        (4) title of "Public Adjuster Contract";16        (5) the insured's full name, street address, insurance 17    company name, and policy number, if known or upon 18    notification;19        (6) a description of the loss and its location;20        (7) description of services to be provided to the 21    insured;22        (8) signatures of the public adjuster and the insured;23        (9) date and time the contract was signed by the   HB3771- 2 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1    public adjuster and date and time the contract was signed 2    by the insured;3        (10) attestation language stating that the public 4    adjuster is fully bonded pursuant to State law; and5        (11) full salary, fee, commission, compensation, or 6    other considerations the public adjuster is to receive for 7    services, including any applicable cap under Section 1570.8    (b) The contract may specify that the public adjuster 9shall be named as a co-payee on an insurer's payment of a 10claim.11        (1) If the compensation is based on a share of the 12    insurance settlement, the exact percentage shall be 13    specified.14        (2) Initial expenses to be reimbursed to the public 15    adjuster from the proceeds of the claim payment shall be 16    specified by type, with dollar estimates set forth in the 17    contract and with any additional expenses first approved 18    by the insured.19        (3) Compensation provisions in a public adjuster 20    contract shall not be redacted in any copy of the contract 21    provided to the Director.22    (c) If the insurer, not later than 5 business days after 23the date on which the loss is reported to the insurer, either 24pays or commits in writing to pay to the insured the policy 25limit of the insurance policy, the public adjuster shall:26        (1) not receive a commission consisting of a   HB3771- 3 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1    percentage of the total amount paid by an insurer to 2    resolve a claim;3        (2) inform the insured that loss recovery amount might 4    not be increased by insurer; and5        (3) be entitled only to reasonable compensation from 6    the insured for services provided by the public adjuster 7    on behalf of the insured, based on the time spent on a 8    claim and expenses incurred by the public adjuster, until 9    the claim is paid or the insured receives a written 10    commitment to pay from the insurer.11    (d) A public adjuster shall not have provide the insured a 12written disclosure concerning any direct or indirect financial 13interest that the public adjuster has with any other party who 14is involved in any aspect of the claim, other than the salary, 15fee, commission, or other consideration established in the 16written contract with the insured, including, but not limited 17to, any ownership of or any compensation expected to be 18received from, any construction firm, salvage firm, building 19appraisal firm, board-up company, or any other firm that 20provides estimates for work, or that performs any work, in 21conjunction with damages caused by the insured loss on which 22the public adjuster is engaged. The word "firm" shall include 23any corporation, partnership, association, joint-stock 24company, or person.25    (e) A public adjuster contract may not contain any 26contract term that:  HB3771- 4 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1        (1) allows the public adjuster's percentage fee to be 2    collected when money is due from an insurance company, but 3    not paid, or that allows a public adjuster to collect the 4    entire fee from the first check issued by an insurance 5    company, rather than as a percentage of each check issued 6    by an insurance company;7        (2) requires the insured to authorize an insurance 8    company to issue a check only in the name of the public 9    adjuster;10        (3) precludes a public adjuster or an insured from 11    pursuing civil remedies;12        (4) includes any hold harmless agreement that provides 13    indemnification to the public adjuster by the insured for 14    liability resulting from the public adjuster's negligence; 15    or16        (5) provides power of attorney by which the public 17    adjuster can act in the place and instead of the insured. 18    (f) The following provisions apply to a contract between a 19public adjuster and an insured:20        (1) Prior to the signing of the contract, the public 21    adjuster shall provide the insured with a separate signed 22    and dated disclosure document regarding the claim process 23    that states:24    "Property insurance policies obligate the insured to 25    present a claim to his or her insurance company for 26    consideration. There are 3 types of adjusters that could   HB3771- 5 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1    be involved in that process. The definitions of the 3 2    types are as follows:3            (A) "Company adjuster" means the insurance 4        adjusters who are employees of an insurance company. 5        They represent the interest of the insurance company 6        and are paid by the insurance company. They will not 7        charge you a fee.8            (B) "Independent adjuster" means the insurance 9        adjusters who are hired on a contract basis by an 10        insurance company to represent the insurance company's 11        interest in the settlement of the claim. They are paid 12        by your insurance company. They will not charge you a 13        fee.14            (C) "Public adjuster" means the insurance 15        adjusters who do not work for any insurance company. 16        They represent the insured to assist in the 17        preparation, presentation and settlement of the claim. 18        The insured hires them by signing a contract agreeing 19        to pay them a fee or commission based on a percentage 20        of the settlement, or other method of compensation.".21        (2) The insured is not required to hire a public 22    adjuster to help the insured meet his or her obligations 23    under the policy, but has the right to do so.24        (3) The public adjuster is not a representative or 25    employee of the insurer or the Department of Insurance.26        (4) The salary, fee, commission, or other   HB3771- 6 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1    consideration is the obligation of the insured, not the 2    insurer, except when rights have been assigned to the 3    public adjuster by the insured.4    (g) The contracts shall be executed in duplicate to 5provide an original contract to the public adjuster, and an 6original contract to the insured. The public adjuster's 7original contract shall be available at all times for 8inspection without notice by the Director.9    (h) The public adjuster shall provide the insurer or its 10authorized representative for receiving notice of loss or 11damage with an exact copy of the contract with the insured by 12email no later than 5 business days after execution of the 13contract, authorizing the public adjuster to represent the 14insured's interest.15    (i) The public adjuster shall give the insured written 16notice of the insured's rights as a consumer under the law of 17this State.18    (j) A public adjuster shall not provide services, other 19than emergency services, until a written contract with the 20insured has been executed, on a form filed with and approved by 21the Director, and an exact copy of the contract has been 22provided to the insurer in accordance with subsection (h). At 23the option of the insured, any such contract shall be voidable 24for 5 business days after the contract is received by the 25insurer. The insured may void the contract by notifying the 26public adjuster in writing by (i) registered or certified   HB3771- 7 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1mail, return receipt requested, to the address shown on the 2contract, (ii) personally serving the notice on the public 3adjuster, or (iii) sending an email to the email address shown 4on the contract.5    (k) If the insured exercises the right to rescind the 6contract, anything of value given by the insured under the 7contract will be returned to the insured within 15 business 8days following the receipt by the public adjuster of the 9cancellation notice.10    (l) All contracts entered into that are in violation of 11this Section are void and invalid. 12(Source: P.A. 103-216, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (215 ILCS 5/1590)14    Sec. 1590. Standards of conduct of public adjuster.15    (a) A public adjuster is obligated, under his or her 16license, to serve with objectivity and complete loyalty for 17the interests of his client alone, and to render to the insured 18such information, counsel, and service, as within the 19knowledge, understanding, and opinion in good faith of the 20licensee, as will best serve the insured's insurance claim 21needs and interest.22    (b) A public adjuster may not propose or attempt to 23propose to any person that the public adjuster represent that 24person while a loss-producing occurrence is continuing, nor 25while the fire department or its representatives are engaged   HB3771- 8 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1at the damaged premises, nor between the hours of 7:00 p.m. and 28:00 a.m.3    (c) A public adjuster shall not permit an unlicensed 4employee or representative of the public adjuster to conduct 5business for which a license is required under this Article.6    (d) A public adjuster shall not have a direct or indirect 7financial interest in any aspect of the claim, other than the 8salary, fee, commission, or other consideration established in 9the written contract with the insured, unless full written 10disclosure has been made to the insured as set forth in 11subsection (d) of Section 1575.12    (e) A public adjuster shall not acquire any interest in 13the salvage of property subject to the contract with the 14insured unless the public adjuster obtains written permission 15from the insured after settlement of the claim with the 16insurer as set forth in subsection (d) of Section 1575 of this 17Article.18    (f) The public adjuster shall abstain from referring or 19directing the insured to get needed repairs or services in 20connection with a loss from any person. , unless disclosed to 21the insured:22        (1) with whom the public adjuster has a direct or 23    indirect financial interest; or24        (2) from whom the public adjuster may receive direct 25    or indirect compensation for the referral.26    (g) (Blank). The public adjuster shall disclose to an   HB3771- 9 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1insured if he or she has any interest or will be compensated by 2any construction firm, salvage firm, building appraisal firm, 3board-up company, or any other firm that performs any work in 4conjunction with damages caused by the insured loss. The word 5"firm" shall include any corporation, partnership, 6association, joint-stock company or individual as set forth in 7Section 1575 of this Article.8    (h) Any compensation or anything of value in connection 9with an insured's specific loss that will be received by a 10public adjuster shall be disclosed by the public adjuster to 11the insured in writing including the source and amount of any 12such compensation.13    (i) In all cases where the loss giving rise to the claim 14for which the public adjuster was retained arise from damage 15to a personal residence, the insurance proceeds shall be 16delivered to the named insured or his or her designee. Where 17proceeds paid by an insurance company are paid jointly to the 18insured and the public adjuster, the insured shall release 19such portion of the proceeds that are due the public adjuster 20within 30 calendar days after the insured's receipt of the 21insurance company's check, money order, draft, or release of 22funds. If the proceeds are not so released to the public 23adjuster within 30 calendar days, the insured shall provide 24the public adjuster with a written explanation of the reason 25for the delay. 26    (j) Public adjusters shall adhere to the following general   HB3771- 10 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1ethical requirements:2        (1) a public adjuster shall not undertake the 3    adjustment of any claim if the public adjuster is not 4    competent and knowledgeable as to the terms and conditions 5    of the insurance coverage, or which otherwise exceeds the 6    public adjuster's current expertise;7        (2) a public adjuster shall not knowingly make any 8    oral or written material misrepresentations or statements 9    which are false or maliciously critical and intended to 10    injure any person engaged in the business of insurance to 11    any insured client or potential insured client;12        (3) no public adjuster, while so licensed by the 13    Department, may represent or act as a company adjuster or 14    independent adjuster on the same claim;15        (4) the contract shall not be construed to prevent an 16    insured from pursuing any civil remedy after the 17    5-business day revocation or cancellation period;18        (5) a public adjuster shall not enter into a contract 19    or accept a power of attorney that vests in the public 20    adjuster the effective authority to choose the persons who 21    shall perform repair work;22        (6) a public adjuster shall ensure that all contracts 23    for the public adjuster's services are in writing and set 24    forth all terms and conditions of the engagement; and25        (7) a public adjuster shall not advance money or any 26    valuable consideration, except emergency services to an   HB3771- 11 -LRB104 10433 BAB 20508 b1    insured pending adjustment of a claim. 2    (k) A public adjuster may not agree to any loss settlement 3without the insured's knowledge and consent and shall, upon 4the insured's request, provide the insured with a document 5setting forth the scope, amount, and value of the damages 6prior to request by the insured for authority to settle the 7loss.8    (l) A public adjuster shall not provide legal advice or 9representation to the insured or engage in the unauthorized 10practice of law.11    (m) A public adjuster shall not represent that he or she is 12a representative of an insurance company, a fire department, 13or the State of Illinois, that he or she is a fire 14investigator, that his or her services are required for the 15insured to submit a claim to the insured's insurance company, 16or that he or she may provide legal advice or representation to 17the insured. A public adjuster may represent that he or she has 18been licensed by the State of Illinois.19(Source: P.A. 103-216, eff. 1-1-24.)